California, session 20252026, AB2693.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 89005.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:89005.5. (a) (1) All of the following names are the property of the state:(A) “California State University.”(B) The names of all educational institutions in the state with names containing the words “California State University.”(C) All of the following names:(i) “California Maritime Academy.”(ii) “California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo.”(iii) “California State Polytechnic University, Humboldt.”(iv) “California State Polytechnic University, Pomona.”(v) “Humboldt State University.”(vi) “San Diego State University.”(vii) “San Francisco State University.”(viii) “San Jose State University.”(ix) “Sonoma State University.”(D) Abbreviations of names listed in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) “Cal Maritime.”(ii) “Cal Poly.”(iii) “Cal Poly Maritime.”(iv) “Cal Poly Maritime Academy.”(v) “Cal State.”(vi) “CSU.”(vii) “Humboldt State.”(viii) “San Diego State.”(ix) “San Francisco State.”(x) “San Jose State.”(xi) “Sonoma State.”(2) No person shall, without the permission of the Trustees of the California State University, use this name, or any abbreviation of it or any name of which these words are a part, in any of the following ways:(A) To designate any business, social, political, religious, or other organization, including, but not limited to, any corporation, firm, partnership, association, group, activity, or enterprise.(B) To imply, indicate, or otherwise suggest that any product, service, or organization is connected or affiliated with, or is endorsed, favored, or supported by, or is opposed by the Trustees of the California State University or any educational institution administered by the trustees. The permission of the trustees is required before any name listed in this subdivision may be used for any commercial purpose.(C) To display, advertise, or announce this name publicly at, or in connection with, any meeting, assembly, or demonstration, or any propaganda, advertising, or promotional activity of any kind which has for its purpose or any part of its purpose the support, endorsement, advancement, opposition, or defeat of any strike, lockout, or boycott or of any political, religious, sociological, or economic movement, activity, or program.(b) Nothing in this section shall interfere with any person who makes, or restrict the right of any person to make, a true and accurate statement of their present or former relationship or connection with, their employment by, or their enrollment in, the California State University in the course of stating their experience or qualifications for any academic, governmental, business, or professional credit or enrollment, or in connection with any academic, governmental, professional, or other employment whatsoever.(c) Every person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.SEC. 2. On or before January 1, 2028, the Trustees of the California State University shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes all of the following:(a) A description of the organizational and administrative structure governing the Cal Poly Maritime Academy following its integration with California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo, including the reporting relationships of the Cal Poly Maritime Academy’s president or equivalent officer, the status of Cal Poly Maritime Academy Corps of Cadets, and any changes to academic program offerings, accreditation, or degree requirements resulting from the integration.(b) The status of all existing agreements, grants, and programmatic relationships between Cal Poly Maritime Academy and the United States Maritime Administration.(c) A description of the transition from the Training Ship Golden Bear to the Training Ship Golden State, including the status of any state-funded capital improvements made to facilities at the Cal Poly Maritime Academy’s Vallejo campus to accommodate the Training Ship Golden State.(d) A fiscal summary of any costs to the state associated with the integration, including any changes to CSU system support allocations, and capital expenditures at the Cal Poly Maritime Academy’s Vallejo campus not funded by federal sources.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.